Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-832
Certified Community Behavioral Health Clinic Act; act, how cited.

Sections 71-832 to 71-837 shall be known and may be cited as the Certified Community Behavioral Health Clinic Act.

Laws 2023, LB276, § 2.